Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,125.07
Mobile cosmetology salon license; change of ownership or mobile unit; effect.

Each mobile cosmetology salon license issued shall be in effect solely for the owner or owners and the mobile unit named thereon and shall expire automatically upon any change of ownership or mobile unit. An original application for licensure shall be submitted and approved before such salon may reopen for business.

Laws 2018, LB731, § 43.